Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Records

§ 43-21-251.
Court records.

The court records of the youth court shall include:

A general docket in which the clerk of the youth court shall enter the names of the parties in each cause, the date of filing the petition, any other pleadings, all other papers in the cause, issuance and return of process, and a reference by the minute book and page to all orders made therein. The general docket shall be duly indexed in the alphabetical order of the names of the parties.

All the papers and pleadings filed in a cause. The papers in every cause shall be marked with the style and number of the cause and the date when filed. All the papers filed in a cause shall be kept in the same file, and all the files shall be kept in numerical order.

All social records of a youth court, which shall include all intake records, social summaries, medical examinations, mental health examinations, transfer studies and all other information obtained and prepared in the discharge of official duty for the youth court.

A “social summary” is an investigation of the personal and family history and the environment of a child who is the subject of a youth court cause. The social summary should describe all reasonable appropriate alternative dispositions. The social summary should contain a specific plan for the care and assistance to the child with a detailed explanation showing the necessity for the proposed plan of disposition.

A “medical examination” is an examination by a physician of a child who is the subject of a youth court cause or of his parent. The youth court may order a medical examination at any time after the intake unit has received a written complaint. Whenever possible, a medical examination shall be conducted on an outpatient basis. A medical examination of a parent of the child who is the subject of the cause shall not be ordered unless the physical or mental ability of the parent to care for the child is a relevant issue in the particular cause and the parent to be examined consents to the examination.

A “mental health examination” is an examination by a psychiatrist or psychologist of a child who is the subject of a youth court cause or of his parent. The youth court may order a mental health examination at any time after the intake unit has received a written complaint. Whenever possible, a mental health examination shall be conducted on an outpatient basis. A mental health examination of a parent of the child who is the subject of a cause shall not be ordered unless the physical or mental ability of the parent to care for the child is a relevant issue in the particular cause and the parent to be examined consents to the examination.

A “transfer study” is a social summary which addresses the factors set forth in Section 43-21-157(5). A transfer study shall not be admissible evidence nor shall it be considered by the court at any adjudicatory hearing. It shall be admissible evidence at a transfer or disposition hearing.

A minute book in which the clerk shall record all the orders of the youth court.

Proceedings of the youth court and evidence.

All information obtained by the youth court from the Administrative Office of Courts pursuant to a request under Section 43-21-261(15).

The records of the youth court and the contents thereof shall be kept confidential and shall not be disclosed except as provided in Section 43-21-261.

The court records of the youth court may be kept on computer in the manner provided for storing circuit court records and dockets as provided in Section 9-7-171. The Administrative Office of Courts shall recommend to the youth courts a uniform format to maintain the records of such courts.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 23; Laws, 1994, ch. 458, § 9; Laws, 1997, ch. 440, § 6; Laws, 2014, ch. 375, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 43-21-253.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1997, ch. 440, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

[Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 24]

§ 43-21-255.
Law enforcement records.

Except as otherwise provided by this section, all records involving children made and retained by law enforcement officers and agencies or by the youth court prosecutor and the contents thereof shall be kept confidential and shall not be disclosed except as provided in Section 43-21-261.

A child in the jurisdiction of the youth court and who has been taken into custody for an act, which if committed by an adult would be considered a felony or offenses involving possession or use of a dangerous weapon or any firearm, may be photographed or fingerprinted or both. Any law enforcement agency taking such photographs or fingerprints shall immediately report the existence and location of the photographs and fingerprints to the youth court. Copies of fingerprints known to be those of a child shall be maintained on a local basis only. Such copies of fingerprints may be forwarded to another local, state or federal bureau of criminal identification or regional depository for identification purposes only. Such copies of fingerprints shall be returned promptly and shall not be maintained by such agencies.

Any law enforcement record involving children who have been taken into custody for an act, which if committed by an adult would be considered a felony and/or offenses involving possession or use of a dangerous weapon including photographs and fingerprints, may be released to a law enforcement agency supported by public funds, youth court officials and appropriate school officials without a court order under Section 43-21-261. Law enforcement records shall be released to youth court officials and to appropriate school officials upon written request. Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, any law enforcement agency releasing such records of children in the jurisdiction of the youth court shall immediately report the release and location of the records to the youth court. The law enforcement agencies, youth court officials and school officials receiving such records are prohibited from using the photographs and fingerprints for any purpose other than for criminal law enforcement and juvenile law enforcement. Each law enforcement officer or employee, each youth court official or employee and each school official or employee receiving the records shall submit to the sender a signed statement acknowledging his or her duty to maintain the confidentiality of the records. In no instance shall the fact that such records of children in the jurisdiction of the youth court exist be conveyed to any private individual, firm, association or corporation or to any public or quasi-public agency the duties of which do not include criminal law enforcement or juvenile law enforcement.

When a child’s driver’s license is suspended for refusal to take a test provided under the Mississippi Implied Consent Law, the law enforcement agency shall report such refusal, without a court order under Section 43-21-261, to the Commissioner of Public Safety in the same manner as such suspensions are reported in cases involving adults.

All records involving a child convicted as an adult or who has been twice adjudicated delinquent for a sex offense as defined by Section 45-33-23, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall be public and shall not be kept confidential.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 25; Laws, 1980, ch. 550, § 10; Laws, 1994, ch. 595, § 4; Laws, 1995, ch. 595, § 10; Laws, 2000, ch. 499, § 22, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

§ 43-21-257.
Agency records.

Unless otherwise provided in this section, any record involving children, including valid and invalid complaints, and the contents thereof maintained by the Department of Human Services or the Department of Child Protection Services, or any other state agency, shall be kept confidential and shall not be disclosed except as provided in Section 43-21-261.

The Office of Youth Services shall maintain a state central registry containing the number and disposition of all cases together with such other useful information regarding those cases as may be requested and is obtainable from the records of the youth court. The Office of Youth Services shall annually publish a statistical record of the number and disposition of all cases, but the names or identity of any children shall not be disclosed in the reports or records. The Office of Youth Services shall adopt such rules as may be necessary to carry out this subsection. The central registry files and the contents thereof shall be confidential and shall not be open to public inspection. Any person who discloses or encourages the disclosure of any record involving children from the central registry shall be subject to the penalty in Section 43-21-267. The youth court shall furnish, upon forms provided by the Office of Youth Services, the necessary information, and these completed forms shall be forwarded to the Office of Youth Services. The Department of Human Services and its employees are exempt from any civil liability as a result of any action taken pursuant to the compilation or release of information on the central registry under this section and any other applicable section of this code, unless determined that an employee has willfully and maliciously violated the rules and administrative procedures of the department pertaining to the central registry or any section of this code. If an employee is determined to have willfully and maliciously performed such a violation, said employee shall not be exempt from civil liability in this regard.

The Department of Child Protection Services shall maintain a state central registry on neglect and abuse cases containing (a) the name, address and age of each child, (b) the nature of the harm reported, (c) the name and address of the person responsible for the care of the child, and (d) the name and address of the substantiated perpetrator of the harm reported. “Substantiated perpetrator” shall be defined as an individual who has committed an act(s) of sexual abuse or physical abuse that would otherwise be deemed as a felony or any child neglect that would be deemed as a threat to life. A name is to be added to the registry only based upon a criminal conviction or an adjudication by a youth court judge or court of competent jurisdiction, ordering that the name of the perpetrator be listed on the central registry. The central registry shall be confidential and shall not be open to public inspection. Any person who discloses or encourages the disclosure of any record involving children from the central registry without following the rules and administrative procedures of the department shall be subject to the penalty in Section 43-21-267. The Department of Child Protection Services and its employees are exempt from any civil liability as a result of any action taken pursuant to the compilation or release of information on the central registry under this section and any other applicable section of this code, unless determined that an employee has willfully and maliciously violated the rules and administrative procedures of the department pertaining to the central registry or any section of this code. If an employee is determined to have willfully and maliciously performed such a violation, said employee shall not be exempt from civil liability in this regard.

The Mississippi State Department of Health may release the findings of investigations into allegations of abuse within licensed day care centers made under the provisions of Section 43-21-353(8) to any parent of a child who is enrolled in the day care center at the time of the alleged abuse or at the time the request for information is made. The findings of any such investigation may also be released to parents who are considering placing children in the day care center. No information concerning those investigations may contain the names or identifying information of individual children.

The Department of Health shall not be held civilly liable for the release of information on any findings, recommendations or actions taken pursuant to investigations of abuse that have been conducted under Section 43-21-353(8).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 26; Laws, 1993, ch. 450, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 591, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 329, § 3; Laws, 2000, ch. 436, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 509, § 2; Laws, 2003, ch. 489, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 28, 2003); Laws, 2019, ch. 464, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 2019; Laws, 2019, ch. 473, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 43-21-259.
Confidentiality of other records involving children.

All other records involving children and the contents thereof shall be kept confidential and shall not be disclosed except as provided in section 43-21-261.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 27, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 43-21-261.
Disclosure of records.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, records involving children shall not be disclosed, other than to necessary staff or officials of the youth court, a guardian ad litem appointed to a child by the court, or a Court-Appointed Special Advocate (CASA) volunteer who may be assigned in an abuse and neglect case, except pursuant to an order of the youth court specifying the person or persons to whom the records may be disclosed, the extent of the records which may be disclosed and the purpose of the disclosure. Such court orders for disclosure shall be limited to those instances in which the youth court concludes, in its discretion, that disclosure is required for the best interests of the child, the public safety, the functioning of the youth court, or to identify a person who knowingly made a false allegation of child abuse or neglect, and then only to the following persons:

The judge of another youth court or member of another youth court staff;

The court of the parties in a child custody or adoption cause in another court;

A judge of any other court or members of another court staff, including the chancery court that ordered a forensic interview;

Representatives of a public or private agency providing supervision or having custody of the child under order of the youth court;

Any person engaged in a bona fide research purpose, provided that no information identifying the subject of the records shall be made available to the researcher unless it is absolutely essential to the research purpose and the judge gives prior written approval, and the child, through his or her representative, gives permission to release the information;

The Mississippi Department of Employment Security, or its duly authorized representatives, for the purpose of a child’s enrollment into the Job Corps Training Program as authorized by Title IV of the Comprehensive Employment Training Act of 1973 (29 USCS Section 923 et seq.). However, no records, reports, investigations or information derived therefrom pertaining to child abuse or neglect shall be disclosed;

Any person pursuant to a finding by a judge of the youth court of compelling circumstances affecting the health, safety or well-being of a child and that such disclosure is in the best interests of the child or an adult who was formerly the subject of a youth court delinquency proceeding;

A person who was the subject of a knowingly made false allegation of child abuse or neglect which has resulted in a conviction of a perpetrator in accordance with Section 97-35-47 or which allegation was referred by the Department of Child Protection Services to a prosecutor or law enforcement official in accordance with the provisions of Section 43-21-353(4).

Law enforcement agencies may disclose information to the public concerning the taking of a child into custody for the commission of a delinquent act without the necessity of an order from the youth court. The information released shall not identify the child or his address unless the information involves a child convicted as an adult.

Any records involving children which are disclosed under an order of the youth court or pursuant to the terms of this section and the contents thereof shall be kept confidential by the person or agency to whom the record is disclosed unless otherwise provided in the order. Any further disclosure of any records involving children shall be made only under an order of the youth court as provided in this section.

Upon request, the parent, guardian or custodian of the child who is the subject of a youth court cause or any attorney for such parent, guardian or custodian, shall have the right to inspect any record, report or investigation relevant to a matter to be heard by a youth court, except that the identity of the reporter shall not be released, nor the name of any other person where the person or agency making the information available finds that disclosure of the information would be likely to endanger the life or safety of such person. The attorney for the parent, guardian or custodian of the child, upon request, shall be provided a copy of any record, report or investigation relevant to a matter to be heard by a youth court, but the identity of the reporter must be redacted and the name of any other person must also be redacted if the person or agency making the information available finds that disclosure of the information would be likely to endanger the life, safety or well-being of the person. A record provided to the attorney under this section must remain in the attorney’s control and the attorney may not provide copies or access to another person or entity without prior consent of a court with appropriate jurisdiction.

Upon request, the child who is the subject of a youth court cause shall have the right to have his counsel inspect and copy any record, report or investigation which is filed with the youth court or which is to be considered by the youth court at a hearing.

The youth court prosecutor or prosecutors, the county attorney, the district attorney, the youth court defender or defenders, or any attorney representing a child shall have the right to inspect and copy any law enforcement record involving children.

The Department of Child Protection Services shall disclose to a county prosecuting attorney or district attorney any and all records resulting from an investigation into suspected child abuse or neglect when the case has been referred by the Department of Child Protection Services to the county prosecuting attorney or district attorney for criminal prosecution.

Agency records made confidential under the provisions of this section may be disclosed to a court of competent jurisdiction.

Records involving children shall be disclosed to the Division of Victim Compensation of the Office of the Attorney General upon the division’s request without order of the youth court for purposes of determination of eligibility for victim compensation benefits.

Information concerning an investigation into a report of child abuse or child neglect may be disclosed by the Department of Child Protection Services without order of the youth court to any attorney, physician, dentist, intern, resident, nurse, psychologist, social worker, family protection worker, family protection specialist, child caregiver, minister, law enforcement officer, or a public or private school employee making that report pursuant to Section 43-21-353(1) if the reporter has a continuing professional relationship with the child and a need for such information in order to protect or treat the child.

Information concerning an investigation into a report of child abuse or child neglect may be disclosed without further order of the youth court to any interagency child abuse task force established in any county or municipality by order of the youth court of that county or municipality.

Names and addresses of juveniles twice adjudicated as delinquent for an act which would be a felony if committed by an adult or for the unlawful possession of a firearm shall not be held confidential and shall be made available to the public.

Names and addresses of juveniles adjudicated as delinquent for murder, manslaughter, burglary, arson, armed robbery, aggravated assault, any sex offense as defined in Section 45-33-23, for any violation of Section 41-29-139(a)(1) or for any violation of Section 63-11-30, shall not be held confidential and shall be made available to the public.

The judges of the circuit and county courts, and presentence investigators for the circuit courts, as provided in Section 47-7-9, shall have the right to inspect any youth court records of a person convicted of a crime for sentencing purposes only.

The victim of an offense committed by a child who is the subject of a youth court cause shall have the right to be informed of the child’s disposition by the youth court.

A classification hearing officer of the State Department of Corrections, as provided in Section 47-5-103, shall have the right to inspect any youth court records, excluding abuse and neglect records, of any offender in the custody of the department who as a child or minor was a juvenile offender or was the subject of a youth court cause of action, and the State Parole Board, as provided in Section 47-7-17, shall have the right to inspect such records when the offender becomes eligible for parole.

The youth court shall notify the Department of Public Safety of the name, and any other identifying information such department may require, of any child who is adjudicated delinquent as a result of a violation of the Uniform Controlled Substances Law.

The Administrative Office of Courts shall have the right to inspect any youth court records in order that the number of youthful offenders, abused, neglected, truant and dependent children, as well as children in need of special care and children in need of supervision, may be tracked with specificity through the youth court and adult justice system, and to utilize tracking forms for such purpose.

Upon a request by a youth court, the Administrative Office of Courts shall disclose all information at its disposal concerning any previous youth court intakes alleging that a child was a delinquent child, child in need of supervision, child in need of special care, truant child, abused child or neglected child, as well as any previous youth court adjudications for the same and all dispositional information concerning a child who at the time of such request comes under the jurisdiction of the youth court making such request.

The Administrative Office of Courts may, in its discretion, disclose to the Department of Public Safety any or all of the information involving children contained in the office’s youth court data management system known as Mississippi Youth Court Information Delivery System or “MYCIDS.”

The youth courts of the state shall disclose to the Joint Legislative Committee on Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review (PEER) any youth court records in order that the number of youthful offenders, abused, neglected, truant and dependent children, as well as children in need of special care and children in need of supervision, may be tracked with specificity through the youth court and adult justice system, and to utilize tracking forms for such purpose. The disclosure prescribed in this subsection shall not require a court order and shall be made in sortable, electronic format where possible. The PEER Committee may seek the assistance of the Administrative Office of Courts in seeking this information. The PEER Committee shall not disclose the identities of any youth who have been adjudicated in the youth courts of the state and shall only use the disclosed information for the purpose of monitoring the effectiveness and efficiency of programs established to assist adjudicated youth, and to ascertain the incidence of adjudicated youth who become adult offenders.

In every case where an abuse or neglect allegation has been made, the confidentiality provisions of this section shall not apply to prohibit access to a child’s records by any state regulatory agency, any state or local prosecutorial agency or law enforcement agency; however, no identifying information concerning the child in question may be released to the public by such agency except as otherwise provided herein.

In every case of child abuse or neglect, if a child’s physical condition is medically labeled as medically “serious” or “critical” or a child dies, the confidentiality provisions of this section shall not apply. In such cases, the following information may be released by the Mississippi Department of Child Protection Services: the cause of the circumstances regarding the fatality or medically serious or critical physical condition; the age and gender of the child; information describing any previous reports of child abuse or neglect investigations that are pertinent to the child abuse or neglect that led to the fatality or medically serious or critical physical condition; the result of any such investigations; and the services provided by and actions of the state on behalf of the child that are pertinent to the child abuse or neglect that led to the fatality or medically serious or critical physical condition.

Any member of a foster care review board designated by the Department of Child Protection Services shall have the right to inspect youth court records relating to the abuse, neglect or child in need of supervision cases assigned to such member for review.

Information concerning an investigation into a report of child abuse or child neglect may be disclosed without further order of the youth court in any administrative or due process hearing held, pursuant to Section 43-21-257, by the Department of Child Protection Services for individuals whose names will be placed on the central registry as substantiated perpetrators.

The Department of Child Protection Services may disclose records involving children to the following:

A foster home, residential child-caring agency or child-placing agency to the extent necessary to provide such care and services to a child;

An individual, agency or organization that provides services to a child or the child’s family in furtherance of the child’s permanency plan to the extent necessary in providing those services;

Health and mental health care providers of a child to the extent necessary for the provider to properly treat and care for the child;

An educational institution or educational services provider where the child is enrolled or where enrollment is anticipated to the extent necessary for the school to provide appropriate services to the child; and

Any other state agency if the disclosure is necessary to the department in fulfilling its statutory responsibilities in protecting the best interests of the child.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 28; Laws, 1980, ch. 550, § 4; Laws, 1986, ch. 422, § 1; Laws, 1988, ch. 459; Laws, 1989, ch. 433, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 468 § 6; Laws, 1994, ch. 591, § 2; Laws, 1994, ch. 595, § 5; Laws, 1995, ch. 547, § 3; Laws, 1997, ch. 440, § 8; Laws, 1998, ch. 447, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 516, § 19; Laws, 2000, ch. 436, § 2; Laws, 2000, ch. 499, § 23; Laws, 2001, ch. 360, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 393, § 12; Laws, 2004, ch. 489, § 2; Laws, 2006, ch. 600, § 3; Laws, 2007, ch. 478, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 587, § 11; Laws, 2010, ch. 349, § 1; Laws, 2013, ch. 531, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 375, § 2; Laws, 2017, ch. 420, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2017; Laws, 2019, ch. 464, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2019; Laws, 2019, ch. 473, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 43-21-263.
Sealing of records.

The youth court may order the sealing of records involving children:

if the child who was the subject of the cause has attained twenty (20) years of age;

if the youth court dismisses the cause; or

if the youth court sets aside an adjudication in the cause.

The youth court may, at any time, upon its own motion or upon application of a party to a youth court cause, order the sealing or unsealing of the records involving children.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 29; Laws, 1980, ch. 550, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1980.

§ 43-21-265.
Destruction of records.

The youth court, in its discretion, may order the destruction of any records involving children except medical or mental health examinations as defined in Section 43-21-253. This order shall be directed to all persons maintaining the records, shall order their physical destruction by an appropriate means specified by the youth court and shall require the persons to file with the youth court a written report of compliance with the order. No records, however, may be destroyed without the approval of the director of the department of archives and history.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 30; Laws, 1980, ch. 550, § 13; Laws, 1981, ch. 501, § 24, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 43-21-267.
Penalty for violation.

Any person who shall disclose or encourage the disclosure of any records involving children or the contents thereof without the proper authorization under this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and punished, upon conviction, by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or by imprisonment in the county jail of not more than one (1) year or by both such fine and imprisonment.

Nothing herein shall prevent the youth court from finding in civil contempt, as provided in Section 43-21-153, any person who shall disclose any records involving children or the contents thereof without the proper authorization under this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 31, eff from and after July 1, 1979.